hy_AM.dic
ածխացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
աճապարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ամաչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ամրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անբախտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անզգամացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անհայտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անմահացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անողոքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անցկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անցնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
ապախոշորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապահովեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապշեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
առատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
առնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
ասաց/CHVI
ավտոմատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արբեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արթնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արմացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բախտավորեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բավականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բարեբախտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բարձրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բերրիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բլբլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բնակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բռնկեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բևեռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գազիֆիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գաղջացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գայթակղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գերհագեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գժվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գլգլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոհացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոռոզացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
գտնովի/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
գրմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դաժանացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դառնալ/CHVAVIDEA2G2INLO
դարձել/VAVBVEVI
դժգունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դղրդեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դյուրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դնդնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դռռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դրեց/VI
ելնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
եռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
երիտասարդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զայրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զարթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զգաստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զզվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զովացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զվարթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զրնգզրնգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
էլեկտրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ըմբոստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ընկերացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ընկնել/CHVAVBVDDEA2G2INLO
թանձրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թացացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թթվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թմրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թշշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թռնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
թռչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
թրխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թփթփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ժպտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իդեալացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իջեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իջնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
լայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լեհացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լի/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լխկլխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լռեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լփրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խավարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խենթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խլշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խմեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խշխշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոժոռեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոշորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոտորեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խռխռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խրտնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծաղկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծանրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծիծաղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծլնգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծղրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծնկծնկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծռեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծուլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կաթկթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կակղի/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կանաչացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կապտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կարծրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կափկափեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կեռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կլկլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կմկմացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոմպենսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոնսոլիդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոոպերացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կորցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կպնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կպչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կռթկռթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կռվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կտկտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կրճտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հագնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հագցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
համակենտրոնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
համեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հայրենադարձնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հանգեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հանդարտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հանրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հապաղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հասկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հասնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հավանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հավերժացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հարազատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հարստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հեծնել/CHVAVBVDDEA2G2INLO
հեղգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հետևեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հիպնոսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հնազանդեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հոգնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հոտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հրամցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ձգռտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճայթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճթճթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճկունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճոխացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճռճռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճտճտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մագնիսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մանրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մարդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մեռնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մեռցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մթնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մղկտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մոխրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մռմռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մտովի/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մրսեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նամացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ներքինացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նյարդայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նվաստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շահեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շեկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շխկրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շշկռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շողշողացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շվշվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շրխկշրխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շրփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շփփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
որոշակիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չափազանցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չկչկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չրթկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չփչփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պակասեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պայթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պապանձեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պատահեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պարարտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պարզեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պարտասեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պլզացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պստիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պրծնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
ջգրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ռազմականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սազեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սատկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սեփականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սլլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սովրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ստվարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սքանչացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վատթարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերագտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
վերադարձնել/CHDEINLOVDVE
վերադարձվել/CHDEINLOVDVE
վերակենդանացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վստահացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տալ/CHVAVIDEA2ABG2GEINLOPM
տառապեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տարել/VI
տեղեկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տեսնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
տնանկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տվեց/CHVI
ցամաքեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցանցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցնծացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ուժեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ունեմ/CHVI
ուռցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փախնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
փայլեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փխրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փողփողեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փչացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փսփսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
քարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
քոչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
օդընտելացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ֆսֆսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
